src/phonology/sms-phon.twolc
!! possible triggers between stem and PALNo and PAL
BetweenStemAndPALNo = [ BetweenStemAndHeight [(%^VOWLower:|%^VOWRaise:|%^LowerI2E:) (%^PALÄ:|%^PALE:|%^PALẸ:|%^PALÕ:|%^PALÂ:)| %^VOWBack: ] (%^Allegro:) ] ;

!! possible triggers between word end and consonant grade
BetweenStemAndConsGrade = [ BetweenStemAndHeight ((%^VOWRaise:|%^VOWLower:|%^LowerI2E:) ((%^PALÂ:|%^PALÕ:) (%^Allegro:) %^PALNo:|%^VOWLower: %^PALÄ: |(%^PALÕ:|%^PALE:|%^PALÄ:|%^PALẸ:) (%^Allegro:) %^PAL:)| %^VOWBack: (%^Allegro:) (%^PALNo:|%^PAL:) ) ] ;

!! possible triggers between vowel length and Palatalization
BetweenVowLengthAndPALNo = [(%^VOWLower:|%^VOWRaise:|%^LowerI2E:) (%^PALÄ:|%^PALE:|%^PALẸ:|%^PALÕ:|%^PALÂ:)| %^VOWBack: ] ;

BetweenVowHeightAndConsGrade = [((%^PALE:|%^PALÄ:|%^PALẸ:|%^PALÕ:) (%^Allegro:) %^PAL:|(%^PALÂ:|%^PALÕ:) (%^Allegro:) %^PALNo:)] ;

!! possible triggers between VowHeight and word end
!! {{{
BetweenVowHeightAndMorph = [(%^VOWFront:|%^VOWBack:) (%^VOWTense:|%^VOWLax:) ((%^PALE:|%^PALÄ:|%^PALẸ:|%^PALÕ:) (%^Allegro:) %^PAL:|(%^PALÂ:|%^PALÕ:) (%^Allegro:) %^PALNo:)] ; !!= * @CODE@ 
!! }}}


BetweenPALNoAndMorphRightArrow = [(%^CC2C:|%^C2CC:|%^XY2XYY:|%^XYY2XY:|%^K2GG:|%^KK2GG:|%^CC2CCC:|%^CCC2C:|%^CCC2CC:|%^XYY2VY:|%^XYY2VYY:|%^KKK2GG:) ] ;

BetweenPALNoAndMorph = [(%^CC2C:|%^C2CC:|%^XY2XYY:|%^XYY2XY:|%^K2GG:|%^KK2GG:|%^CC2CCC:|%^CCC2C:|%^CCC2CC:|%^XYY2VY:|%^XYY2VYY:|%^KKK2GG:) RBound ] ;

PenBetweenStemAndPALNo = [(%^Pen: %^V2VV:|%^Pen: %^VV2V:) (%^Pen: %^VOWRaise:|%^Pen: %^VOWLower:|%^Pen: %^VOWBack:) (%^Pen: %^Allegro:) ] ;

PenBetweenStemAndPALAllo  = [ (%^Pen: %^V2VV:|%^Pen: %^VV2V:) (%^Pen: %^VOWLower:|%^Pen: %^VOWRaise:|%^Pen: %^LowerI2E:)] ;


PenBetweenStemAndConsGrade = [(%^Pen: %^V2VV:|%^Pen: %^VV2V:) ((%^Pen: %^VOWRaise:|%^Pen: %^VOWLower:) ((%^Pen: %^PALÂ:|%^Pen: %^PALÕ:) (%^Pen: %^Allegro:) %^Pen: %^PALNo:|(%^Pen: %^PALÕ:|%^Pen: %^PALE:|%^Pen: %^PALÄ:|%^Pen: %^PALẸ:) (%^Pen: %^Allegro:) %^Pen: %^PAL:)| %^Pen: %^VOWBack: (%^Pen: %^Allegro:) (%^Pen: %^PALNo:|%^Pen: %^PAL:) ) ] ;

PenBetweenStemAndVowelLoss = [(%^Pen: %^V2VV:|%^Pen: %^VV2V:) [(%^Pen: %^VOWRaise:|%^Pen: %^VOWLower:) ((%^Pen: %^PALÂ:|%^Pen: %^PALÕ:) (%^Pen: %^Allegro:) %^Pen: %^PALNo:|(%^Pen: %^PALE:|%^Pen: %^PALÄ:|%^Pen: %^PALẸ:|%^Pen: %^PALÕ:) (%^Pen: %^Allegro:) %^Pen: %^PAL:)| %^Pen: %^VOWBack: (%^Pen: %^Allegro:) (%^Pen: %^PALNo:|%^Pen: %^PAL:)] ([%^Pen: %^C2CC:|%^Pen: %^XY2XYY:]|%^Pen: %^CC2C:|%^Pen: %^XYY2XY:|%^Pen: %^CC2CCC:)] ;


PenBetweenStemAndStemFinalVoicing = [(%^Pen: %^V2VV:|%^Pen: %^VV2V:) [(%^Pen: %^VOWRaise:|%^Pen: %^VOWLower:) ((%^Pen: %^PALÂ:|%^Pen: %^PALÕ:) (%^Pen: %^Allegro:) %^Pen: %^PALNo:|(%^Pen: %^PALÕ:|%^Pen: %^PALE:|%^Pen: %^PALÄ:|%^Pen: %^PALẸ:) (%^Pen: %^Allegro:) %^Pen: %^PAL:)| %^Pen: %^VOWBack: (%^Pen: %^Allegro:) (%^Pen: %^PALNo:|%^Pen: %^PAL:) ] (%^Pen: %^C2CC:|%^Pen: %^XY2XYY:|%^Pen: %^XYY2VY:|%^Pen: %^CC2C:|%^Pen: %^XYY2XY:|%^Pen: %^CCC2CC:|%^Pen: %^CC2CCC:|%^Pen: %^CCC2C:) (%^RmVow:|%^PenVow2a:)] ;

PenBetweenPALNoAndMorph = [(%^Pen: %^CC2C:|%^Pen: %^C2CC:|%^Pen: %^XYY2XY:|%^Pen: %^KK2GG:|%^Pen: %^CC2CCC:|%^Pen: %^CCC2C:|%^Pen: %^CCC2CC:|%^Pen: %^XY2XYY:|%^Pen: %^XYY2VY:|%^Pen: %^XYY2VYY:|%^Pen: %^KKK2GG:) RBound ] ;


!! neutral to vowel height and backness
!! {{{
NeutrHighBack = [(%^VOWLower:|%^VOWRaise:) (%^VOWFront:|%^VOWBack:)] ; !!= * @CODE@ 
!! }}}

!! neutral to vowel length
VNeutrGrade = [(%^VV2V: |%^V2VV: )];
!! neutral to consonant length
!! {{{
CNeutrGrade = [(%^CC2C: |[%^C2CC:|%^XY2XYY:] |%^CC2CCC: |%^KK2GG: |%^KKK2GG: |%^XYY2VY: |%^XYY2VYY:|%^CCC2CC: )] ;
!! }}}
!! neutral to vowel and consonant length
!! {{{
NeutrGrade = [VNeutrGrade |CNeutrGrade] ; !!= * @CODE@ 
!! }}}



!! * X3 = C Vx Cx Cx     C Vx Vy Cx ˈ Cx
!! * X2 = C Vx Vx Cx Cx  C Vx Vy Cx Cx
!! * X1 = C Vx Vx Cx     C Vx Vy Cx


!! !!!Rules
Rules 

!! !!Vowel shortening rules 



"Vowel shortening {õâØ}:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__ - used in
 %{âõØ%}:0 <=>
          %{âõ%}: _ (u) (%{%ʹØ%}:) CodaAll [ Cns:*|%{XC%}:Cns*]  %^VV2V:  ;


"Vowel shortening {âØ}:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__ - used in
 %{âØ%}:0 <=>
   PenUltCns  _ (:ʼ) Cns:+ PenBetweenStemAndVowelLoss %^RmVow: ;


"Vowel shortening {ieẹØ}:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__ - used in +Ind+Prs+Pl3, +Ind+Prt+Pl3
 %{ẹiØ%}:0 <=>
   %{ẹi%}: _ (u|i) (%{%ʹØ%}:) CodaAll (PenUltCns) (Vow: Cns:+ %^Pen:) %^VV2V:  ;
!! teevvad+V+Prt+4:
!!€ t%{ẹi%}%{ẹiØ%}%{vØ}v%^VV2V%^VOWRaise%>uš
!!€ ti0vv00%>uš


"Vowel shortening %{ieØ%}:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__ - 
 %{ieØ%}:0 <=>
   %{ei%}: _ (u|i) (%{%ʹØ%}:) CodaAll (PenUltCns) (Vow: Cns:+ %^Pen:) %^VV2V:  ;

"Vowel shortening {eØ}:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__ -
 %{eØ%}:0 <=>
   e: _ (u|i) (%{%ʹØ%}:) CodaAll (PenUltCns) (Vow: Cns:+ %^Pen:) %^VV2V: ;
   PenUltCns  _ (%{%ʹØ%}:ʹ) [Cns:+|i:|n j|l m|s ǩ:|s t|š ǩ:|š m] PenBetweenStemAndVowelLoss %^RmVow: ; 
!! eʹǩrded+V+Inf
!!€ e%{eØ%}ʹǩ%{ǩØ%}%{eØ%}rd%^Pen%^VV2V%^Pen%^CC2C%^RmVow%>ed
!!€ e0ʹǩ00rd00000%>ed

!! deriving cieʹǩǩes+N+Sg+Ill: ceäkˈksa

!! Ââvel+N+Prop+Sg+Loc  __Ivalo__
!!€ Ââv%{e0%}l%^RmVow%>est
!!€ Ââv0l0%>est



!2016-05-10!"Even syllabic verbs I, vowel shortening å:0"
!2016-05-10!!! __@RULENAME@__ - used in +Ind+Prs+Pl3, +Ind+Prt+Pl3
!2016-05-10! å:0 <=>
!2016-05-10! OnSetC å: _ (u) (%{%ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ (%{XC%}:Cns)  %^VV2V:  ;
!2016-05-10!!! jååʹtted+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3 __trekk__
!2016-05-10!!!€ jåå0tt%^VV2V%^VOWRaise%^PAL%>e
!2016-05-10!!!€ jo0ʹtt000%>e
!2016-05-10!         OnSetC å: _ (%{%ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ (%{XC%}:Cns) Vow: [Cns:+ |n j|l m|s ǩ:|s t|š ǩ:|š m]  %^Pen: %^VV2V: ;
!2016-05-10!!Not needed here
!2016-05-10!!! sååbbar+N+Sg+Nom __meeting__
!2016-05-10!!!€ så%^1VOWbbar%^Pen%^V2VV
!2016-05-10!!!€ sååbbar00
!2016-05-10!      Cns: (%{XC%}:Cns)  _ Cns:+ PenBetweenStemAndVowelLoss %^RmVow: ;
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!"Even syllabic verbs I, vowel shortening õ:0"
!2016-05-10!!! __@RULENAME@__ - used in +Ind+Prs+Pl3, +Ind+Prt+Pl3
!2016-05-10! õ:0 <=>
!2016-05-10! OnSetC õ: _ (%{%ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ (%{XC%}:Cns) %^VV2V: ;
!2016-05-10!!!€ mõõ0nn%^VV2V%^PAL%>e
!2016-05-10!!!€ mõ0ʹnn00%>e
!2016-05-10!!!€ mõõ0nn%^VV2V%^VOWLower%^PAL%>e
!2016-05-10!!!€ mâ0ʹnn000%>e
!2016-05-10!         OnSetC õ: _ (%{%ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ (%{XC%}:Cns) Vow: [Cns:+|n j|l m|s ǩ:|s t|š ǩ:|š m]  %^Pen: %^VV2V: ;
!2016-05-10!!No needed here
!2016-05-10!!! kõõnjâl+N+Sg+Gen __tear__
!2016-05-10!!!€ kõ%^1VOWnnjâl%^Pen%^VV2V%^Pen%^C2CC
!2016-05-10!!!€ kõ0nnjâl0000
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10! OnSetC õ: _ (u) (%{%ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ (%{XC%}:Cns)  %^VV2V:  ;
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!      Cns:+ (%{XC%}:Cns)  _ Cns:+ PenBetweenStemAndVowelLoss %^RmVow: ;
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!"Even syllabic verbs I, vowel shortening u:0"
!2016-05-10!!! __@RULENAME@__ - used in +Ind+Prs+Pl3, +Ind+Prt+Pl3
!2016-05-10! u:0 <=> OnSetC u: _ (%{%ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ (%{XC%}:Cns) (i:) %^VV2V: ;
!2016-05-10!!Not needed here
!2016-05-10!!! juurd+N+Ess __thought__
!2016-05-10!!!€ ju%^1VOWrdd%>j%>en
!2016-05-10!!!€ ju0rdd%>j%>en
!2016-05-10!      OnSetC  u: _ (%{%ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ Vow: [Cns:+|n j|l m|s ǩ:|s t|š ǩ:|š m] %^Pen: %^VV2V: ;
!2016-05-10!      Cns:+ (%{XC%}:Cns)  _ Cns:+ PenBetweenStemAndVowelLoss %^RmVow: ;
!2016-05-10!!! mainstummuš+N+Sg+Ill:
!2016-05-10!!!€ mainstummuš%^RmVow%>a
!2016-05-10!!!€ mainstumm0š0%>a
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!"Even syllabic verbs I, vowel shortening i:0"
!2016-05-10!!! __@RULENAME@__ - used in +Ind+Prs+Pl3, +Ind+Prt+Pl3
!2016-05-10! i:0 <=>
!2016-05-10!         OnSetC i: _ (%{%ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ (%{XC%}:Cns) %^VV2V: ;
!2016-05-10!!! viikkâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3
!2016-05-10!!!€ vii0kk%^VV2V%^VOWLower%^PAL%>e
!2016-05-10!!!€ ve0ʹǩǩ000%>e
!2016-05-10!         Cns _ %^UltRmVow: %> ǥ a ; 
!2016-05-10!!! +Sg+Ill N_HÕʹPPI
!2016-05-10!!!€ hõʹppi%^UltRmVow%>ǥa
!2016-05-10!!!€ hõʹpp00%>ǥa
!2016-05-10!        OnSetC  _ [Cns:+|n j|l m|s ǩ:|s t|š ǩ:|š m] PenBetweenStemAndVowelLoss %^RmVow: ;
!2016-05-10!!! prääʹzniǩ+N+Sg+Ill: __celebration/juhla__
!2016-05-10!!!€ prääʹzniǩ%^RmVow%^PALNo%>a
!2016-05-10!!!€ prääʹzn0k00%>a
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!         OnSetC i: _ (%{%ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ Vow: [Cns:+|n j|l m|s ǩ:|s t|š ǩ:|š m]  %^Pen: %^VV2V: ; ! iilâsǩ:ilska
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10! OnSetC i: _ (u) (%{%ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ (%{XC%}:Cns)  %^VV2V:  ;
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!      Cns:+ (%{XC%}:Cns)  _ Cns:+ PenBetweenStemAndVowelLoss %^RmVow: ;
!2016-05-10!      [Cns:|Vow:] _ (%^RmVow:) %^I2Zero: ;
!2016-05-10!!!€ žẹẹvai%^RmVow%^I2Zero%>ǥa
!2016-05-10!!!€ žẹẹv0000%>ǥa
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!"Even syllabic verbs I, vowel shortening o:0"
!2016-05-10!!! __@RULENAME@__ - used in +Ind+Prs+Pl3, +Ind+Prt+Pl3
!2016-05-10! o:0 <=> 
!2016-05-10!    OnSetC o: _ (u) (%{%ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ (%{XC%}:Cns) %^VV2V: ;
!2016-05-10!!!€ šoomm%^VV2V%^VOWRaise%>u
!2016-05-10!!!€ šu0mm00%>u
!2016-05-10!    OnSetC o: _ (u) (%{%ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ (%{XC%}:Cns) Vow: Cns:+ (%{XC%}:Cns) %^Pen: %^VV2V: ;
!2016-05-10!!!€ poonjâst%^Pen%^VV2V%^RmVow%>ed
!2016-05-10!!!€ po0nj0st000%>ed
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!         Cns:+ (%{XC%}:Cns) _ [Cns:+|i:|n j|l m|s ǩ:|s t|š ǩ:|š m]  %^RmVow: ; 
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!      Cns:+ (%{XC%}:Cns)  _ Cns:+ PenBetweenStemAndVowelLoss %^RmVow: ;
!2016-05-10!
!2016-05-10!!Not needed here
!2016-05-10!!! ooumaž+N+Sg+Nom
!2016-05-10!!!€ o%^1VOWumm%^V2VV%^XYY2XY%>až
!2016-05-10!!!€ ooum000%>až
!2016-05-10!

"Vowel shortening aä:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__ -
 %{aäØ%}:0 <=>
  %{aä%}: _ (i|u) (%{%ʹØ%}:) CodaAll (PenUltCns) (Vow: Cns:+ (PenUltCns) %^Pen:) %^VV2V: ;



"Vowel shortening {aØ}:0 "
!! __@RULENAME@__ - 
 %{aØ%}:0 <=> 
     a: _ (i|u) (%{%ʹØ%}:) CodaAll (PenUltCns) (Vow: Cns:+ (PenUltCns)  %^Pen:) %^VV2V: ;
!!€ sa%{aØ%}%{%ʹØ%}%{kǩǥj%}%{kǩǥjØ%}%^VV2V%^PAL%>e
!!€ sa0ʹǩǩ00%>e

  PenUltCns   _ (:ʼ) [Cns:+|i:|n j|l m|s ǩ:|s t|š ǩ:|š m] PenBetweenStemAndVowelLoss %^RmVow: ; 
!! Aanar+N+Prop+Sg+Ill: __Inari/Enare__
!!€ Aan%{aØ%}r%^RmVow%>a
!!€ Aan0r0%>a

         OnSetC a: _ (i) (%{%ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ Vow: [Cns:+|n j|l m|s ǩ:|s t|š ǩ:|š m]  %^Pen: %^VV2V: ; 
    :Vow+ (%{%ʹØ%}:) [Cns:+ - [Cns:* [l|n]]] _ i: %^RmVow:  ; 

 OnSetC a: _ (u) (%{%ʹØ%}:) Cns:+ (%{XC%}:Cns)  %^VV2V:  ;
      Cns:+ (%{XC%}:Cns)  _ (:ʼ) Cns:+ PenBetweenStemAndVowelLoss %^RmVow: ;

  OnSetC _ (:ʼ) Cns:+ %^RmVow:  ;
!! mättʼted+V+Inf: __teach/opettaa__
!!€ mätta0t%^RmVow%>ed
!!€ mätt0ʼt0%>ed
